Utah statutes.
34-23-104.   Duty of commission to establish hours and conditions --
Promulgation of rules.
(1)  The commission shall ascertain and establish the hours and the conditions
of labor and employment for any occupation in which minors are employed.
(2)  The commission may promulgate rules consistent with this chapter in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
